Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-316] Role of law enforcement. At
the request of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney, as
appropriate, acting under section 583A-315, a law enforcement officer may take
any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist
the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney with responsibilities under
section 583A-315. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next